District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-1272

Duties and responsibilities.

Repealed.

History

Nov. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 3-36, § 4, 26 DCR 1439
Dec. 21, 1985, D.C. Law 6-74, § 3(b), 32 DCR 6475
Nov. 5, 1990, 104 Stat. 2237, Pub. L. 101-518, § 136
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(l), 57 DCR 181

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 10-1212.
1981 Ed., § 9-603.
1973 Ed., § 9-603.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2082(l) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2082(l) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Transfer of Functions

The functions of the Department of General Services were transferred, in part, to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984, and transferred, in part, to the Department of Administrative Services by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.

Editor's Notes

Council’s desire not to approve proposed food service contract: Pursuant to Resolution 7-148, the “Washington Convention Center Food Service Contract Resolution of 1987,” effective November 10, 1987, the Council expressed its desire not to approve a proposed food service contract entered into between the Convention Center Board of Directors and Service America Concessions Corporation/National Business Services Enterprises, Inc., dated September 23, 1986, and submitted to Council by the Convention Center Board of Directors on October 6, 1987, and the Council recommended that the food service contract be rebid.